Vermont, session 2025-2026, H661.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 601 is amended to read:
§ 601. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
VT LEG #385632 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.661
2026 Page 2 of 3
(11) “Personal injury by accident arising out of and in the course of
employment” includes an injury caused by the willful act of a third person
directed against an employee because of that employment.
* * *
(E) In the case of a firefighter, as defined in 20 V.S.A. § 3151(3) and
(4), who dies or has a disability from a cancer listed in subdivision (iii) of this
subdivision (E), the firefighter shall be presumed to have had the cancer as a
result of exposure to conditions in the line of duty, unless it is shown by a
preponderance of the evidence that the cancer was caused by nonservice-
connected risk factors or nonservice-connected exposure, provided:
(i)(I) the firefighter completed an initial and any subsequent
cancer screening evaluations as recommended by the American Cancer Society
based on the age and sex of the firefighter prior to becoming a firefighter or
while serving as a firefighter, and the evaluation indicated no evidence of
cancer; and
(II) the firefighter was engaged in firefighting duties or other
hazardous activities over a period of at least five years in Vermont prior to the
diagnosis; and
(III) the firefighter is under 65 years of age.
(ii) The presumption shall not apply to any firefighter who has
used tobacco products at any time within 10 years of the date of diagnosis.
VT LEG #385632 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.661
2026 Page 3 of 3
(iii) The disabling cancer shall be limited to leukemia, lymphoma,
or multiple myeloma, and cancers originating in the bladder, brain, breast,
colon, gastrointestinal tract, kidney, larynx, liver, lung, pancreas, pharynx,
reproductive system, skin, or thyroid, or trachea.
(F) A firefighter who is diagnosed with cancer within 10 years of the
last active date of employment as a firefighter shall be eligible for benefits
under this subdivision. The date of injury shall be the date of the last injurious
exposure as a firefighter.
(G) It is recommended that fire departments:
(i) maintain incident report records for at least 10 years; and
(ii) offer or provide annual cancer screenings to all firefighters
who are employed by or who volunteer for the department.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385632 v.1